tr: Başlık hareketi türü: 360° dönme; Eğim; Sabit; Pan; Tilt; Tilt ve pan; Diğer
fr: Type de mouvement de la tête: Rotation à 360°; Inclinaison latérale; Fixe; Panoramique; Inclinaison; Inclinaison et panoramique; Autre
fi: Pään liikkeen tyyppi: 360° kääntö; Sivukallistus; Kiinteä; Panorointi; Kallistus; Kallistus ja panorointi; Muu
bg-BG: Тип движение на главата: 360° завъртане; Страничен наклон; Фиксиран; Панорама; Наклон; Наклон и панорама; Друго
da: Type af hovedbevægelse: 360° drejning; Hældning; Fast; Panorering; Tilt; Tilt og panorering; Andet
nl: Kop beweging type: 360° draaibaar; Zijwaarts kantelen; Vast; Draaien; Kantelen; Kantelen en draaien; Overig
pl: Typ ruchu głowicy: Obrót 360°; Przechylenie; Stały; Panoramowanie; Pochylenie; Pochylenie i panoramowanie; Inny
de: Art der Kopfbewegung: 360°-Schwenk; Neigen (Cant); Starr; Schwenken; Neigen; Neigen & Schwenken; Sonstige
sk-SK: Typ pohybu hlavy: Otáčanie o 360°; Náklon; Pevný; Pan; Nakláňanie; Nakláňanie a panorámovanie; Iné
sl-SI: Vrsta gibanja glave: 360-stopinjsko vrtenje; Zanašanje; Fiksno; Vrtenje; Nagib; Nagib in vrtenje; Drugo
es: Tipo de movimiento del cabezal: Giro de 360°; Inclinación lateral; Fijo; Panorámica; Inclinación; Inclinación y panorámica; Otro
zh-CN: 头部运动类型: 360° 旋转; 侧倾; 固定式; 水平转动; 倾斜; 倾斜和水平转动; 其他
th: ประเภทการเคลื่อนไหวส่วนหัว: หมุนได้ 360 องศา; เอียง; คงที่; แพน; ปรับก้มเงย; ปรับก้มเงยและแพน; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Galvutės judėjimo tipas: 360° pasukimas; Posvyris; Fiksuotas; Pasukimas horizontaliai; Pakreipimas; Pakreipimas ir pasukimas; Kita
en: Head movement type: 360° swivel; Cant; Fixed; Pan; Tilt; Tilt & pan; Other
zh-TW: 頭部動作類型: 360 度旋轉; 傾斜; 固定; 平移; 俯仰; 俯仰與平移; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de movimento da cabeça: Giro de 360°; Inclinação lateral (Cant); Fixo; Panorâmica; Inclinação; Inclinação e panorâmica; Outro
nb: Type hodebevegelse: 360° svingbar; Vipp; Fast; Panorering; Tilt; Tilt og panorering; Annet
pt-PT: Tipo de movimento da cabeça: Rotação a 360°; Inclinação lateral; Fixo; Panorâmico; Inclinação; Inclinação e panorâmico; Outro
ko: 머리 움직임 유형: 360° 회전; 캔트; 고정식; 팬; 틸트; 틸트 및 팬; 기타
vi: Loại chuyển động của đầu: Xoay 360°; Nghiêng ngang; Cố định; Xoay ngang; Nghiêng dọc; Nghiêng và xoay ngang; Khác
ro-RO: Tipul de mișcare a capului: Pivotare 360°; Înclinare laterală (cant); Fix; Panoramare; Înclinare verticală (tilt); Înclinare verticală și panoramare; Altele
sv: Typ av huvudrörelse: 360° vridning; Sidolutning; Fast; Panorering; Lutning; Lutning och panorering; Övrigt
it: Tipo di movimento della testa: Rotazione a 360°; Inclinazione laterale; Fissa; Panoramica; Inclinazione verticale; Inclinazione e panoramica; Altro
ja: 頭の動きのタイプ: 360度回転; カント; 固定; パン; チルト; チルト&パン; その他
ru: Тип движения головки: Вращение на 360°; Боковой наклон; Фиксированный; Поворот; Наклон; Наклон и поворот; Другое
el: Τύπος κίνησης κεφαλής: Περιστροφή 360°; Κλίση; Σταθερή; Πανοραμική κίνηση; Κατακόρυφη κλίση; Κατακόρυφη & πανοραμική κίνηση; Άλλο
cs: Typ pohybu hlavice: Otočení o 360°; Náklon; Pevný; Otáčení (pan); Naklápění; Naklápění a otáčení; Jiné
hr-HR: Vrsta pokreta glave: Okretanje za 360°; Nagib (cant); Fiksno; Zakretanje (pan); Nagib (tilt); Nagib i zakretanje (tilt & pan); Ostalo
hu: Fejmozgás típusa: 360°-ban forgatható; Dönthető; Fix; Forgatható (Pan); Billenthető (Tilt); Billenthető és forgatható; Egyéb